Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1509
Owner, defined.

(1) Owner shall mean:

(a) In the case of a tank in use on or after November 8, 1984, or brought into use after such date, any person who owns a tank used for the storage, use, or dispensing of petroleum; and

(b) In the case of a tank in use before November 8, 1984, but no longer in use on such date, any person who owned such tank immediately before the discontinuation of its use.

(2) Owner shall not include a person who, without participating in the management of a tank and otherwise not engaged in petroleum production, refining, and marketing:

(a) Holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect his or her security interest in a tank or a lienhold interest in the property on or within which a tank is or was located; or

(b) Acquires ownership of a tank or the property on or within which a tank is or was located:

(i) Pursuant to a foreclosure of a security interest in the tank or of a lienhold interest in the property; or

(ii) If the tank or the property was security for an extension of credit previously contracted, pursuant to a sale under judgment or decree, pursuant to a conveyance under a power of sale contained within a trust deed or from a trustee, or pursuant to an assignment or deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(3) Ownership of a tank or the property on or within which a tank is or was located shall not be acquired by a voidable transfer, as provided in the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB70, § 16.

Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, see section 36-801.